Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF435.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 243.90, is amended to read: 243.90 MINNESOTA CORRECTIONAL FACILITY-SHAKOPEE. new text begin (a) new text end There is established the Minnesota Correctional Facility-Shakopee at Shakopee, Minnesota, in which may be placed deleted text begin personsdeleted text end new text begin only biological femalesnew text end committed to the commissioner of corrections by the courts of this state who, in the opinion of the commissioner, may benefit from the programs thereat. The general control and management of the facility shall be under the commissioner. new text begin (b) If the commissioner is housing any inmates at the facility who are not biological females on the effective date of this section, those inmates must be transferred to another facility within seven days of enactment. This paragraph expires on January 1, 2026. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end